Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-901 to 38-910 shall be known and may be cited as the Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,117;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 253.